Massachusetts, session 194th, H4321.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, Christopher
Francis Cachat, the interim fire chief of the Dalton Fire District, may continue to serve in that
position until he reaches 70 years of age, the date of his retirement or the date he is removed or
suspended from office by the board of water commissioners for the Dalton fire district in
accordance with applicable laws, rules or regulations, whichever occurs first; provided, however,
that he remains physically and mentally capable of performing the duties of the position. If
requested, Christopher Francis Cachat shall, at the expense of the fire district, be examined by an
impartial physician designated by the board to determine such capability. No deductions shall be
made from the regular compensation of Christopher Francis Cachat pursuant to chapter 32 of the
General Laws for any service subsequent to him reaching 65 years of age and, upon retirement,
of 2

Christopher Francis Cachat shall receive a superannuation retirement allowance equal to that
which he would have been entitled had he retired at the age of 65.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
of 2